District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.25a

Additional standards for providers of shelter or supportive housing for LGBTQ homeless youth.

Providers of shelter or supportive housing for LGBTQ homeless youth shall implement research-based family acceptance interventions that are designed to educate families on the impact of rejection towards their LGBTQ children and negative outcomes for LGBTQ youth associated with rejection, including depression, suicidal behavior, drug use, and unprotected sex. Family acceptance interventions may include individual and family sessions, assessment tools, and resources for families that promote acceptance by parents and positive well-being and development of LGBTQ youth.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 16a
as added May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 2(i), 61 DCR 1873
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 added this section.